District of Columbia statutes.
38-1503

Rules.

Within 120 days of October 9, 1987, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. The proposed rules shall include provisions regarding the terms of the employment contracts, including the period of service required.

Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-32, § 4, 34 DCR 5312
1981 Ed., § 31-2603.
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 802 to 807 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 809, 810 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-32, the “Nurses Training Corps Establishment Act of 1987”, see Mayor’s Order 89-183, August 14, 1989.
Approval of Nurses’ Training Corps rules: Pursuant to Resolution 8-286, the “Nurses Training Corps Establishment Act Proposed Rules Approval Resolution of 1990”, effective November 2, 1990, the Council approved the proposed rules issued pursuant to the Nurses Training Corps Establishment Act of 1987.